Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6042
Chief medical officer; enforcement; powers.

The chief medical officer as designated in section 81-3115 shall have the authority to enforce sections 71-6038 to 71-6042 and rules and regulations adopted under section 71-6041 by any of the following means: Denial, suspension, restriction, or revocation of a nursing home's license, refusal of the renewal of a nursing home's license, restriction of a nursing home's admissions, or any other enforcement provision granted to the department.

Laws 1983, LB 273, § 5;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 114;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 643;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1239.